Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 14. Wyoming Historic Mine Trail and Byway System

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 188, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 36-8-1401.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 6, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 2005, ch. 188, § 1; related to the historic mine trail and byway commission creation, membership, legislative advisory members, quorum and compensation.

Laws 2009, ch. 6, § 2 makes the act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 24, 2009.

§ 36-8-1402.
Wyoming historic mine trail and byway system; creation; department duties and processes for trail and byway development; advisory groups.

The Wyoming historic mine trail and byway system is created for purposes of designating and identifying historic mine locations and trails and byways linking historic mines within the state, and as such, shall:

Provide a precise history of mineral development in Wyoming;

Interpret the role of mining and minerals in the development of Wyoming’s economy;

Identify and describe Wyoming’s mining and mineral development heritage.

The Wyoming historic mine trail and byway system shall be established by the department of state parks and cultural resources. The system shall expand upon the first designated historic mine trail and byway as established by this subsection, which shall link the gold mines located in South Pass City, Miners’ Delight and Atlantic City, Wyoming, to the iron mines located near Atlantic City, to the uranium mines in the Crooks Gap and Gas Hills mining districts located in Fremont County, Wyoming.

and (d) Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 6, § 2.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 188, § 1; 2009, ch. 6, §§ 1, 2.

The 2009 amendment,

substituted “department of state parks and cultural resources” for “commission created under W.S. 36 8 1401 through a process of nominations submitted from among various public and private sectors within Wyoming which are knowledgeable of historic mining activities, and in consultation and coordination with the affected boards of county commissioners and other local governing bodies and agencies” in the first sentence of (b); and repealed former (c) and (d) pertaining to historic mine trail and byway commission and provision for the disposition of unexpended funds and other property.

Laws 2009, ch. 6, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2009.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 6, § 3, provides:

“(a)

It is the intention and direction of the legislature that:

“(i)

All duties of the Wyoming historic mine trail and byway commission with respect to the Wyoming historic mine trail and byway program be transferred to the department of state parks and cultural resources;

“(ii)

All unexpended funds not otherwise obligated and any other property, if any, of the Wyoming historic mine trail and byway commission exclusively dedicated to the Wyoming historic mine trail and byway program be transferred to the department of state parks and cultural resources;

“(iii)

Any contract, agreement or obligation entered into or assumed by the Wyoming historic mine trail and byway commission with respect to the Wyoming historic mine trail and byway program, if the execution or assumption was within the lawful powers of the Wyoming historic mine trail and byway commission, be assumed by the department of state parks and cultural resources;

“(iv)

Any policy adopted by the Wyoming historic mine trail and byway commission with respect to the Wyoming historic mine trail and byway program remain in effect unaltered as policy of the department of state parks and cultural resources until amended or repealed by the department of state parks and cultural resources.”

§ 36-8-1403.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 6, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 2005, ch. 188, § 1, related to administrative support and annual report to the commission.

Laws 2009, ch. 6, § 2 makes the act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 24, 2009.